Oregon, session 2026R1, SB1511.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. ORS 118.010 is amended to read:
118.010. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Nonresident decedent” means an individual who is domiciled outside of Oregon on the date
the individual dies.
(b) “Resident decedent” means an individual who is domiciled in Oregon on the date the indi-
vidual dies.
(2) A tax is imposed upon a transfer of the property of each:
(a) Resident decedent; and
(b) Nonresident decedent whose estate includes any interest in:
(A) Real property located in Oregon; or
(B) Tangible personal property located in Oregon.
(3) The Oregon taxable estate to be used for purposes of computing the tax imposed under this
section shall be the federal taxable estate:
(a) Increased by:
(A) The deduction for state estate, inheritance, legacy or succession taxes allowable under sec-
tion 2058 of the Internal Revenue Code; and
(B) If the decedent is a surviving spouse owning the property at death, the value of the following
property unless included in the federal taxable estate:
NOTE: Matter in boldfaced type in an amended section is new; matter [italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in boldfaced type.
LC 153

A-Eng. SB 1511
(i) Property for which a deduction for Oregon special marital property under ORS 118.016 was
previously allowed; or
(ii) Property for which a separate Oregon election under section 2056 or 2056A of the Internal
Revenue Code was previously allowed; and
(b) Reduced by:
(A) A deduction in the amount of $1 million;
[(A)] (B) The value on the date of the decedent’s death of all Oregon special marital property
under ORS 118.013;
[(B)] (C) The exemption allowed under ORS 118.145; and
[(C)] (D) Any other applicable exclusions or deductions.
(4) Notwithstanding subsection (5) of this section, a tax is not due under this chapter if
the sum of the Oregon taxable estate plus $1 million is less than or equal to the subject
threshold set forth in subsection (6) of this section.
[(4)] (5) The tax imposed under this section shall be calculated by applying the rates in the fol-
lowing table and applying the adjustment required by subsection (6) of this section. If the
Oregon taxable estate is at least the amount in column 1, but less than the amount in column 2, the
tax prior to any adjustment is the amount in column 3, increased by the excess above the amount
in column 1 multiplied by the percentage in column 4:
[ ___________________________________________________________________________________ ]

1 2 3 4
$1,000,000 $1,500,000 $0 10.0%
1,500,000 2,500,000 50,000 10.25%
2,500,000 3,500,000 152,500 10.5%
3,500,000 4,500,000 257,500 11.0%
4,500,000 5,500,000 367,500 11.5%
5,500,000 6,500,000 482,500 12.0%
6,500,000 7,500,000 602,500 13.0%
7,500,000 8,500,000 732,500 14.0%
8,500,000 9,500,000 872,500 15.0%
9,500,000 1,022,500 16.0%
[ ___________________________________________________________________________________ ]



1 2 3 4
$0 $500,000 $0 12.75%
500,000 1,500,000 63,750 13.00%
1,500,000 2,500,000 193,750 13.50%
2,500,000 3,500,000 328,750 14.25%
3,500,000 4,500,000 471,250 15.25%
4,500,000 5,500,000 623,750 16.25%
5,500,000 6,500,000 786,250 17.25%
6,500,000 7,500,000 958,750 18.25%
7,500,000 8,500,000 1,141,250 19.25%
[2]

A-Eng. SB 1511
8,500,000 1,333,750 19.90%


(6)(a) If the Oregon taxable estate plus $1 million is at least equal to the subject thresh-
old set forth in paragraph (b) of this subsection, but does not exceed the subject threshold
by more than $500,000, the tax imposed shall be the tax under the rates applied in subsection
(5) of this section further adjusted by multiplying the result in subsection (5) of this section
by a fraction. The numerator of the fraction shall be the Oregon taxable estate plus $1
million, minus the subject threshold, and the denominator shall be $500,000.
(b) The subject threshold shall be $2.5 million, and shall be adjusted as provided in sub-
section (7) of this section.
(7)(a) The Department of Revenue shall annually adjust the subject threshold in sub-
section (6) of this section according to the cost-of-living adjustment for the calendar year.
The department shall make this adjustment by multiplying $2.5 million by the percentage, if
any, by which the monthly averaged U.S. City Average Consumer Price Index for the 12
consecutive months ending August 31 of the prior calendar year exceeds the monthly aver-
aged U.S. City Average Consumer Price Index for the 12 consecutive months ending August
31, 2026.
(b) As used in this subsection, “U.S. City Average Consumer Price Index” means the U.S.
City Average Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (All Items) as published by the
Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor.
[(5)(a)] (8)(a) In the case of a resident decedent owning, on the date of the decedent’s death, real
property located outside Oregon or tangible personal property located outside Oregon, the tax im-
posed under this section shall be the amount determined under [subsection (4)] subsections (5) and
(6) of this section multiplied by a ratio.
(b) The numerator of the ratio:
(A) Shall be the sum of the value of the decedent’s real property located in Oregon, tangible
personal property located in Oregon and intangible personal property.
(B) May not include any intangible personal property subject to a tax imposed, as a result of
the death of the decedent, by another state or country.
(C) May not include the value of the exemption allowed under ORS 118.145.
(c) The denominator of the ratio shall be the total value of the decedent’s gross estate, less the
value of the exemption allowed under ORS 118.145.
[(6)] (9) In the case of a nonresident decedent owning, on the date of the decedent’s death, real
property located in Oregon or tangible personal property located in Oregon, the tax imposed under
this section shall be the amount determined under [subsection (4)] subsections (5) and (6) of this
section multiplied by a ratio. The numerator of the ratio shall be the sum of the value of the
decedent’s real property located in Oregon and tangible personal property located in Oregon, less
the value of the exemption allowed under ORS 118.145. The denominator shall be the total value of
the decedent’s gross estate, less the value of the exemption allowed under ORS 118.145.
[(7)] (10) Payment, in whole or in part, of estate taxes from funds of an estate or trust on any
benefit subject to tax under ORS 118.005 to 118.540 is not to be considered a further taxable benefit,
when such payment is directed by the decedent’s will or by a trust agreement.
[(8)(a)] (11)(a) If the federal taxable estate is determined by making an election under section
2031(c), 2032, 2032A, 2056 or 2056A of the Internal Revenue Code or another provision of the
[3]

A-Eng. SB 1511
Internal Revenue Code, or if a federal estate tax return is not required under the Internal Revenue
Code, an executor may make separate elections for state estate tax purposes under that same pro-
vision.
(b) An executor may make elections under ORS 118.013, 118.140 and 118.145 and section 2056
of the Internal Revenue Code for state estate tax purposes.
(c) Elections described in this subsection are irrevocable.
SECTION 2. ORS 118.160 is amended to read:
118.160. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section:
(a) An inheritance tax return is not required with respect to the estates of decedents who die
on or after January 1, 1987, and before January 1, 2003, unless a federal estate tax return is re-
quired to be filed;
(b) An inheritance tax return is not required with respect to the estates of decedents who die
on or after:
(A) January 1, 2003, and before January 1, 2004, unless the value of the gross estate is $700,000
or more;
(B) January 1, 2004, and before January 1, 2005, unless the value of the gross estate is $850,000
or more;
(C) January 1, 2005, and before January 1, 2006, unless the value of the gross estate is $950,000
or more; or
(D) January 1, 2006, and before January 1, 2012, unless the value of the gross estate is $1 million
or more; and
(c) An estate tax return is not required with respect to the estates of decedents who die on or
after:
(A) January 1, 2012, and before January 1, 2027, unless the value of the gross estate is $1
million or more[.]; or
(B) January 1, 2027, unless the value of the gross estate is $2.5 million or more.
(2)(a) The Department of Revenue shall annually adjust the filing threshold applicable to
estates of decedents dying on or after January 1, 2027, according to the cost-of-living ad-
justment for the calendar year. The department shall make this adjustment by multiplying
$2.5 million by the percentage, if any, by which the monthly averaged U.S. City Average
Consumer Price Index for the 12 consecutive months ending August 31 of the prior calendar
year exceeds the monthly averaged U.S. City Average Consumer Price Index for the 12 con-
secutive months ending August 31, 2026.
(b) As used in this subsection, “U.S. City Average Consumer Price Index” means the U.S.
City Average Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (All Items) as published by the
Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor.
[(2)] (3) In every estate, whether or not subject to administration and whether or not a federal
estate tax return is required to be filed, the executor shall at such times and in such manner as
required by rules of the Department of Revenue, file with the department a return in a form pro-
vided by the department setting forth a list and description of all transfers of property, in trust or
otherwise, made by the decedent in the lifetime of the decedent as a division or distribution of the
estate of the decedent and any further data that the department requires to determine estate tax
under this chapter.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding ORS 315.037, the amendments to ORS 118.010 and 118.160
by sections 1 and 2 of this 2026 Act apply to the estates of all decedents who die on or after
[4]

A-Eng. SB 1511
January 1, 2027.
SECTION 4. This 2026 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2026
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.

[5]